Sidath/files/N.foma
### Sinhala14.foma ###

read lexc N.lexc
define Lexicon;



define B [ ව ු |ව ් ව ෙ ම ි | ව ු ව ෙ ම ු  |​ ව ් ව ා ය |​ව ් ව ෝ ය |  ව ් ව ේ |  ව ් ව ො ත ් |​ ව ් ව ෝ ය | ​ ව ් ව ේ ය | ​ ව ් ව ෙ ​ හ ු | ​ ව ් ව ෙ ​ හ ි]; 
define D [ී | ී ​ප න ් |  ී ප ල ් ල ා | ි ය ];





######### Rewrite rules

define PClass1 ො -> ි ||  _  "^" B ;
define PClass2 ො -> 0 ||  _  "^" D ;




# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassFifGrammar 	Lexicon            .o.
                        PClass1          .o.
                        PClass2          .o.
               	        Cleanup;

regex ClassFifGrammar;
